Hawaii statutes.
[§445-95.7] Jurisdiction, venue. An
action under section 445-95.5 or 445-95.6 shall be brought in the district
court and division in which the rooming house is located. [L 1988, c 313, pt of
§3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next